Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.210

Voting entitlement of shares.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class or series, is entitled to one vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders' meeting. Only shares are entitled to vote.

(2) Shares of a corporation are not entitled to vote if they are owned by or otherwise belong to the corporation, directly or indirectly, or by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, through an entity of which a majority of the voting power is held directly or indirectly by the corporation or which is otherwise controlled by the corporation.

(3) Shares held by the corporation in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of any person are entitled to vote unless they are held for the benefit of, or otherwise belong to, the corporation directly or indirectly through an entity of which a majority of the voting power is held directly or indirectly by the corporation or which is otherwise controlled by the corporation.

(4) Redeemable shares are not entitled to vote after delivery of written notice of redemption is effective and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

[ 2020 c 194 s 13; 1989 c 165 s 69.]